Missouri, session 2026, HB2179.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 493, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 493.220, to read as follows:
493.220. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, beginning on the
effective date of this section, in any county with a charter form of government, any
notice required by statute to be published in a newspaper shall also be published on the
website of the office of the secretary of state or published in a newspaper.
2. The office of the secretary of state shall develop procedures for submission of
notices published on its website as provided under this section and create a specific page
on its website that contains all such notices in a searchable format that is easily
accessible to the public.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any political
subdivision or governmental entity that is required by law to publish a public
advertisement, order of publication, legal notice, or any other notice in a newspaper
shall be permitted to publish the identical notice on its official website and on any
official social media accounts it maintains for public notices. In addition to the
newspaper publication or if no qualifying newspaper exists in the jurisdiction or the
newspaper fails or refuses to publish the notice after timely submission and proper
payment, if any, such digital publication shall constitute valid and sufficient notice upon
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2179 2
the filing of an affidavit of publication or attempted publication. The political
subdivision shall retain proof of the digital publication for at least one year.
✔